Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.630

Puget Sound water quality field agents program—Definitions.

As used in RCW 28B.30.630 through 28B.30.638 the following definitions apply:

(1) "Sea grant" means the Washington state sea grant program.

(2) "Cooperative extension" means the cooperative extension service of Washington State University.

[ 1990 c 289 s 1.]